Hawaii statutes.
[§432:1-308] Suspension, revocation,
or denial of certificate of authority. (a) Any certificate of authority
issued under this chapter may be suspended or revoked and any application for a
certificate of authority may be denied if the commissioner finds that any of
the conditions listed below exists:

(1) The mutual benefit society is operating
significantly in contravention of its basic organizational document or in a
manner contrary to that described in any other information submitted under
section 432:1-301, unless amendments to the submissions have been filed with
and approved by the commissioner;

(2) The mutual benefit society is no longer
financially responsible and may reasonably be expected to be unable to meet its
obligations to its members and beneficiaries or prospective members;

(3) The mutual benefit society has failed to correct,
within the time prescribed by subsection (c), any deficiency occurring due to
the mutual benefit society's prescribed minimum net worth being impaired;

(4) The mutual benefit society, or any person on its
behalf, has advertised or merchandised its services in an untrue,
misrepresentative, misleading, deceptive, or unfair manner;

(5) The continued operation of the mutual benefit
society would be hazardous to its members; or

(6) The mutual benefit society has otherwise failed
to substantially comply with this chapter.

(b) In addition to, or in lieu of, suspension
or revocation of a certificate of authority pursuant to this section, the
commissioner may levy an administrative fine upon the mutual benefit society in
an amount not less than $500 and not more than $50,000 pursuant to section
431:3-221.

(c) The following shall pertain when
insufficient net worth is maintained:

(1) Whenever the commissioner finds that the net
worth maintained by any mutual benefit society subject to this chapter is less
than the minimum net worth required, the commissioner shall give written notice
to the mutual benefit society of the amount of the deficiency and require the
mutual benefit society to:

(A) File with the commissioner a plan for
correction of the deficiency acceptable to the commissioner; and

(B) Correct the deficiency within a
reasonable time, not to exceed sixty days, unless an extension of time, not to
exceed sixty additional days, is granted by the commissioner. The deficiency
shall be deemed an impairment, and failure to correct the impairment in the
prescribed time shall be grounds for suspension or revocation of the
certificate of authority or for placing the mutual benefit society in
conservation, rehabilitation, or liquidation; and

(2) Unless allowed by the commissioner, no mutual
benefit society or person acting on its behalf, directly or indirectly, may
renew, issue, or deliver any certificate, agreement, or contract of coverage in
this State for which a premium is charged or collected, when the mutual benefit
society writing the coverage is impaired and the fact of the impairment is
known to the mutual benefit society or to the person; provided that the existence
of an impairment shall not prevent the issuance or renewal of a certificate,
agreement, or contract when the member exercises an option granted under the
plan to obtain a new, renewed, or converted coverage.

(d) A certificate of authority shall be
suspended or revoked, an application for a certificate of authority denied, or
an administrative fine imposed, only after compliance with the requirements of
this section, including the following:

(1) Suspension or revocation of a certificate of
authority, denial of an application, or imposition of an administrative fine
pursuant to this section shall be by written order and shall be sent to the
mutual benefit society or applicant by certified or registered mail. The
written order shall state the grounds, charges, or conduct on which suspension,
revocation, denial, or administrative penalty is based. The mutual benefit
society or applicant, in writing, may request a hearing pursuant to section
431:2-308; and

(2) If the mutual benefit society or applicant
requests a hearing pursuant to this section, the commissioner shall issue a
written notice of hearing and send it to the mutual benefit society or
applicant by certified or registered mail and to the director of labor and
industrial relations stating:

(A) A specific time for the hearing, which
may not be less than twenty nor more than thirty days after mailing of the
notice of hearing; and

(B) A specific place for the hearing.

(e) When the certificate of authority of a
mutual benefit society is suspended, the mutual benefit society shall not,
during the period of the suspension, enroll any additional members except
newborn children or other newly acquired dependents of existing members and
shall not engage in any advertising or solicitation whatsoever.

(f) When the certificate of authority of a
mutual benefit society is revoked, the society, immediately following the
effective date of the order of revocation, shall proceed to wind up its affairs
and shall conduct no further business except as may be essential to the orderly
conclusion of the affairs of the society. The mutual benefit society shall
engage in no further advertising or solicitation whatsoever. The commissioner,
by written order, may permit further operation of the society as the commissioner
may find to be in the best interest of the members, to the end that members
will be afforded the greatest practical opportunity to obtain continuing
coverage and benefits. [L 2015, c 63, §23]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next